engine/dictionaries/cs_CZ/cs_CZ.aff
SFX B   out         ujme       [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujte       [^m]out
SFX B   out         ul         [^m]out
SFX B   out         ula        [^m]out
SFX B   out         ulo        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uli        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uly        [^m]out
SFX B   out         u          mout
SFX B   out         eš         mout
SFX B   out         e          mout
SFX B   out         eme        mout
SFX B   out         ete        mout
SFX B   t           0          mout
SFX B   out         i          mout
SFX B   out         ěme        mout
SFX B   out         ěte        mout
SFX B   t           nu         tat
SFX B   t           neš        tat
SFX B   t           ne         tat
SFX B   t           neme       tat
SFX B   t           nete       tat
SFX B   t           nou        tat
SFX B   t           ň          tat
SFX B   t           ňme        tat
SFX B   t           ňte        tat
SFX B   at          ím         pat
SFX B   at          íš         pat
SFX B   at          í          pat
SFX B   at          íme        pat
SFX B   at          íte        pat
SFX B   at          i          pat
SFX B   at          ěme        pat
SFX B   at          ěte        pat
SFX B   rat         řu         rat
SFX B   rat         řeš        rat
SFX B   rat         ře         rat
SFX B   rat         řeme       rat
SFX B   rat         řete       rat
SFX B   rat         řou        rat
SFX B   rat         ř          rat
SFX B   rat         řme        rat
SFX B   rat         řte        rat
SFX B   0           i          [aáeě]t
SFX B   t           l          [aáeě]t
SFX B   t           la         [aáeě]t
SFX B   t           lo         [aáeě]t
SFX B   t           li         [aáeě]t
SFX B   t           ly         [aáeě]t
SFX B   ít          ils        ít #přidané hovorové tvary minulého času
SFX B   ít          ilas       ít
SFX B   ít          ilos       ít
SFX B   ýt          yls        ýt
SFX B   ýt          ylas       ýt
SFX B   ýt          ylos       ýt
SFX B   out         uls        [^m]out
SFX B   out         ulas       [^m]out
SFX B   out         ulos       [^m]out
SFX B   t           ls         [aáeě]t
SFX B   t           las        [aáeě]t
SFX B   t           los        [aáeě]t


SFX O Y 64
SFX O   en          na         [os]ten
SFX O   en          no         [os]ten
SFX O   en          ni         [os]ten
SFX O   en          ny         [os]ten
SFX O   en          nu         [os]ten
SFX O   0           a          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           o          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           i          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           y          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           u          [^os]ten
SFX O   en          na         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          no         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          ni         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          ny         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          nu         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           a          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           o          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           i          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           y          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           u          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           a          [^e]n
SFX O   0           o          [^e]n
SFX O   0           i          [^e]n
SFX O   0           y          [^e]n
SFX O   0           u          [^e]n
SFX O   0           a          [^nlvý]
SFX O   0           o          [^nlvý]
SFX O   0           i          [^nlvýghkr]
SFX O   0           y          [^nlvý]
SFX O   0           u          [^nlvý]
SFX O   k           ci         k
SFX O   r           ři         r
SFX O   0           a          [^e]l
SFX O   0           o          [^e]l
SFX O   0           i          [^e]l
SFX O   0           y          [^e]l
SFX O   0           a          [^š]el
SFX O   0           o          [^š]el
SFX O   0           i          [^š]el
SFX O   0           y          [^š]el
SFX O   el          la         šel
SFX O   el          lo         šel
SFX O   el          li         šel
SFX O   el          ly         šel
SFX O   ev          va         ev
SFX O   ev          vo         ev
SFX O   ev          vi         ev
SFX O   ev          vy         ev
SFX O   ev          vu         ev
SFX O   0           a          [^e]v
SFX O   0           o          [^e]v
SFX O   0           i          [^e]v
SFX O   0           y          [^e]v
SFX O   0           u          [^e]v
SFX O   ý           o          ý
SFX O   0           s          [^e]l #přidané hovorové tvary minulého času
SFX O   0           as         [^e]l
SFX O   0           os         [^e]l
SFX O   0           s          [^š]el
SFX O   0           as         [^š]el
SFX O   0           os         [^š]el
SFX O   0           s          šel
SFX O   el          las        šel
SFX O   el          los        šel


SFX X Y 27
SFX X   a           ouc        a
SFX X   a           oucí/Y     a
SFX X   a           ouce       a
SFX X   e           íc         e
SFX X   e           ící/Y      e
SFX X   e           íce        e
SFX X   ě           íc         ě
SFX X   ě           ící/Y      ě
SFX X   ě           íce        ě
SFX X   0           ši         [dv]
SFX X   0           ší/Y       [dv]
SFX X   0           še         [dv]
SFX X   0           ši         et
SFX X   0           ší/Y       et
SFX X   0           še         et
SFX X   out         uv         out
SFX X   out         uvši       out
SFX X   out         uvší/Y     out
SFX X   out         uvše       out
SFX X   t           v          [ai]t
SFX X   t           vši        [ai]t
SFX X   t           vší/Y      [ai]t
SFX X   t           vše        [ai]t
SFX X   ýt          yv         ýt
SFX X   ýt          yvši       ýt
SFX X   ýt          yvší/Y     ýt
SFX X   ýt          yvše       ýt
